Washington statutes.
RCW 13.22.010

Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Department" means the department of children, youth, and families.

(2) "Detention facility" means:

(a) Any detention facility as defined under RCW 13.40.020; and

(b) Any juvenile correctional facility under alternative administration operated by a consortium of counties under RCW 13.04.035.

(3) "Imminent harm" means immediate and impending threat of a person causing bodily injury to self or others.

(4) "Institution" has the same meaning as in RCW 13.40.020.

(5) "Isolation" means confinement that occurs (a) when a youth is separated from the youth population and placed in a room for longer than fifteen minutes for the purpose of discipline, behavior modification, or due to an imminent threat to the safety of the youth or others; and (b) in a room other than the room assigned to the youth for sleeping. Juveniles are in isolation from the moment they are separated from others until they have rejoined the population. Juveniles who are pregnant shall not be put into isolation. Maintaining appropriate gender separation does not constitute isolation.

(6) "Juvenile" means:

(a) Any individual who is under the chronological age of eighteen years; and

(b) Any individual under the chronological age of twenty-five years who is confined in an institution, including an individual confined in an institution under RCW 72.01.410.

(7) "Juvenile court administrator" means an administrator appointed pursuant to RCW 13.04.035.

(8) "Room confinement" means a juvenile is separated from the youth population and placed in a room or cell that the juvenile is assigned to for sleeping, other than during normal sleeping hours or interim rest hours. "Room confinement" does not include time a youth requests to spend in his or her room or rest periods in between facility programming. Juveniles are in room confinement from the moment they are separated from others until they are permitted to rejoin the population.

(9) "Solitary confinement" means a youth is involuntarily separated from the youth population and placed in a room or cell other than the room assigned to the youth for sleeping for longer than fifteen minutes for punitive purposes. Different terminology does not exempt practice from being "solitary confinement."

[ 2020 c 333 s 2.]